Utah statutes.
76-10-511.   Possession of loaded firearm at residence or on real property
authorized.
Except for persons described in Section 76-10-503 and 18 U.S.C. Sec. 922(g)
and as otherwise prescribed in this part, a person may have a loaded firearm:
(1)  at the person's place of residence, including any temporary residence or
camp; or
(2)  on the person's real property.
